District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Fair Taxation of Municipal Bonds Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-1803.02(a)(1)(B)(ii) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new sub-subparagraph (III) to read as follows:
“(III) Shall not, and shall not have been required to, include
interest on the obligations of a state, a territory of the United States, or any political subdivision
thereof acquired by the taxpayer before January 1, 2025, in the computation of District gross
income.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.